District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-614

Incorporation fee.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 586a
Mar. 2, 1929, 45 Stat. 1503, ch. 523
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-614.
1981 Ed., § 29-814.
1973 Ed., § 29-414.